California statutes. Business and Professions Code
The income of a licensed clinical social worker corporation attributable to professional services rendered while a shareholder is a disqualified person, as defined in the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act (Part 4 (commencing with Section 13400) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code), shall not in any manner accrue to the benefit of that shareholder or his or her shares in the licensed clinical social workers corporation.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 4998.5 by Stats. 1999, Ch. 657, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

4998.5.

A licensed clinical social worker corporation shall not do or fail to do any act the doing of which or the failure to do which would constitute unprofessional conduct under any statute, rule, or regulation now or hereafter in effect. In the conduct of its practice, it shall observe and be bound by those statutes, rules, and regulations to the same extent as a person holding a license as a licensed clinical social worker.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 135, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 15. Telephone Medical Advice Services [4999. - 4999.7.]

4999.

“Telephone medical advice service” means any business entity that employs, or contracts or subcontracts, directly or indirectly, with, the full-time equivalent of five or more persons functioning as health care professionals, whose primary function is to provide telephone medical advice, that provides telephone medical advice services to a patient at a California address. “Telephone medical advice service” does not include a medical group that operates in multiple locations in California if no more than five full-time equivalent persons at any one location perform telephone medical advice services and those persons limit the telephone medical advice services to patients being treated at that location.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 799, Sec. 28.   (SB 1039)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.2.

A telephone medical advice service shall be responsible for complying with the following requirements:

(a) (1) Ensuring that all health care professionals who provide medical advice services are appropriately licensed, certified, or registered as a physician and surgeon pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) or the Osteopathic Initiative Act, as a dentist, dental hygienist, dental hygienist in alternative practice, or dental hygienist in extended functions pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1600), as an occupational therapist pursuant to Chapter 5.6 (commencing with Section 2570), as a registered nurse pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2700), as a
 psychologist pursuant to Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900), as a naturopathic doctor pursuant to Chapter 8.2 (commencing with Section 3610), as a marriage and family therapist pursuant to Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 4980), as a licensed clinical social worker pursuant to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 4991), as a licensed professional clinical counselor pursuant to Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 4999.10), as an optometrist pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 3000), or as a chiropractor pursuant to the Chiropractic Initiative Act, and operating consistent with the laws governing their respective scopes of practice in the state within which they provide telephone medical advice services, except as provided in subdivision (b).

(2) Ensuring that all health care professionals who provide telephone
 medical advice services from an out-of-state location, as identified in paragraph (1), are licensed, registered, or certified in the state within which they are providing the telephone medical advice services and are operating consistent with the laws governing their respective licenses and scopes of practice.

(b) Ensuring that the telephone medical advice provided is consistent with good professional practice.

(c) Maintaining records of telephone medical advice services, including records of complaints, provided to patients in California for a period of at least five years.

(d) Ensuring that no staff member uses a title or designation when speaking to an enrollee, subscriber, or consumer that may cause a reasonable person
 to believe that the staff member is a licensed, certified, or registered health care professional described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), unless the staff member is a licensed, certified, or registered professional.

(e) Complying with all directions and requests for information made by the Department of Consumer Affairs and respective healing arts licensing boards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 684, Sec. 1.   (AB 1102)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.5.

The respective healing arts licensing boards shall be responsible for enforcing this chapter and any other laws and regulations affecting California licensed health care professionals providing telephone medical advice services.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 799, Sec. 34.   (SB 1039)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.7.

(a) This section does not limit, preclude, or otherwise interfere with the practices of other persons licensed or otherwise authorized to practice, under any other provision of this division, telephone medical advice services consistent with the laws governing their respective scopes of practice, or licensed under the Osteopathic Initiative Act or the Chiropractic Initiative Act and operating consistent with the laws governing their respective scopes of practice.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, “telephone medical advice” means a telephonic communication between a patient and a health care professional in which the health care professional’s primary function is to provide to the patient a telephonic response to the
 patient’s questions regarding his or her or a family member’s medical care or treatment. “Telephone medical advice” includes assessment, evaluation, or advice provided to patients or their family members.

(c) For purposes of this chapter, “health care professional” is an employee or independent contractor described in Section 4999.2 who provides medical advice services and is appropriately licensed, certified, or registered as a dentist, dental hygienist, dental hygienist in alternative practice, or dental hygienist in extended functions pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1600), as a physician and surgeon pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) or the Osteopathic Initiative Act, as a registered nurse pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2700), as a psychologist pursuant to Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900), as a naturopathic doctor pursuant to Chapter 8.2 (commencing with Section 3610), as an
 optometrist pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 3000), as a marriage and family therapist pursuant to Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 4980), as a licensed clinical social worker pursuant to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 4991), as a licensed professional clinical counselor pursuant to Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 4999.10), or as a chiropractor pursuant to the Chiropractic Initiative Act, and who is operating consistent with the laws governing his or her respective scopes of practice in the state in which he or she provides telephone medical advice services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 426, Sec. 52.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 15.5. Health Advice From Artificial Intelligence [4999.8. - 4999.9.]

4999.8.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Artificial intelligence” or “AI” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 11546.45.5 of the Government Code.

(b) “Generative artificial intelligence” or “GenAI” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 11549.64 of the Government Code.

(c) “Health care profession” means any profession that is the subject of licensure or regulation under this division or under any initiative act referred to in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 615, Sec. 1.   (AB 489)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.9.

(a) (1) A violation of this chapter is subject to the jurisdiction of the appropriate health care professional licensing board or enforcement agency.

(2) The appropriate health care professional licensing board may pursue an injunction or restraining order to enforce the provisions of this chapter, as authorized by Section 125.5.

(3) Nothing in this section limits the
 authority for a health care professional licensing board or enforcement agency to pursue any remedy otherwise authorized under the law.

(b) Any provision of this division that prohibits the use of specified terms, letters, or phrases to indicate or imply possession of a license or certificate to practice a health care profession, without at that time having the appropriate license or certificate required for that practice or profession, shall be enforceable against a person or entity who develops or deploys a system or device that uses one or more of those terms, letters, or phrases in the advertising or functionality of an artificial intelligence or generative artificial intelligence system, program, device, or similar technology.

(c) The use of a term, letter, or phrase in the
 advertising or functionality of an AI or GenAI system, program, device, or similar technology that indicates or implies that the care, advice, reports, or assessments being offered through the AI or GenAI technology is being provided by a natural person in possession of the appropriate license or certificate to practice as a health care professional, is prohibited.

(d) Each use of a prohibited term, letter, or phrase shall constitute a separate violation of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 615, Sec. 1.   (AB 489)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 16. Licensed Professional Clinical Counselors [4999.10. - 4999.129.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administration [4999.10. - 4999.14.]

4999.10.

This chapter constitutes, and may be cited as, the Licensed Professional Clinical Counselor Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 619, Sec. 3.   (SB 788)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.11.

In enacting this chapter, the Legislature recognizes that licensed professional clinical counselors practice a separate and distinct profession from the professions practiced by licensed marriage and family therapists and licensed clinical social workers. As such, the Legislature recognizes the need to appropriately test licensed marriage and family therapists and licensed clinical social workers seeking to become licensed professional clinical counselors on the difference in practice between the professions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 619, Sec. 3.   (SB 788)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.12.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Board” means the Board of Behavioral Sciences.

(b) “Accredited” means a school, college, or university accredited by a regional or national institutional accrediting agency that is recognized by the United States Department of Education.

(c) “Approved” means a school, college, or university that possessed unconditional approval by the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education at the time of the applicant’s graduation from the school, college, or university.

(d) “Applicant for licensure” means an unlicensed person who has completed the required education and required hours of supervised experience for licensure.

(e) “Licensed professional clinical counselor” or “LPCC” means a person licensed under this chapter to practice professional clinical counseling, as defined in Section 4999.20.

(f) “Associate” means an unlicensed person who meets the requirements of Section 4999.42 and is registered with the board.

(g) “Clinical counselor trainee” means an unlicensed person who is currently enrolled in a master’s or doctoral degree program, as specified in Section 4999.32 or 4999.33, that is designed to qualify the person for licensure and who has completed no less than 12
 semester units or 18 quarter units of coursework in any qualifying degree program.

(h) “Supervisor” means an individual who meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Has held an active license for at least two years within the five-year period immediately preceding any supervision as either:

(A) A licensed professional clinical counselor, licensed marriage and family therapist, psychologist licensed pursuant to Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900), licensed clinical social worker, licensed educational psychologist, or equivalent out-of-state license. A licensed educational psychologist may only supervise the provision of educationally related mental health services that are consistent with the scope of
 practice of an educational psychologist, as specified in Section 4989.14.

(B) A physician and surgeon who is certified in psychiatry by the American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology, or an out-of-state licensed physician and surgeon who is certified in psychiatry by the American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology.

(2) For at least two years within the five-year period immediately preceding any supervision, has practiced psychotherapy, provided psychological counseling pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 4989.14, or provided direct clinical supervision of psychotherapy performed by marriage and family therapist trainees, associate marriage and family therapists, associate professional clinical counselors, or associate clinical social workers. Supervision of
 psychotherapy performed by a social work intern or a professional clinical counselor trainee shall be accepted if the supervision provided is substantially equivalent to the supervision required for registrants.

(3) Has received training in supervision as specified in this
 chapter and by regulation.

(4) Has not provided therapeutic services to the supervisee.

(5) Has and maintains a current and active license that is not under suspension or probation as one of the following:

(A) A marriage and family therapist, professional clinical counselor, clinical social worker, or licensed educational psychologist issued by the board.

(B) A psychologist licensed pursuant to Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900).

(C) A physician and surgeon who is certified in psychiatry by the American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology.

(6) Is not a spouse, domestic partner, or relative of the supervisee.

(7) Does not currently have or previously had a personal, professional, or business relationship with the supervisee that undermines the authority or effectiveness of the supervision.

(i) “Client centered advocacy” includes, but is not limited to, researching, identifying, and accessing resources, or other activities, related to obtaining or providing services and supports for clients or groups of clients receiving psychotherapy or counseling services.

(j) “Advertising,” as used in this chapter, includes, but is not limited to, any public communication as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 651, the issuance of any card, sign, or device to
 any person, or the causing, permitting, or allowing of any sign or marking on, or in, any building or structure, or in any newspaper, magazine, or directory, or any printed matter whatsoever, with or without any limiting qualification. Signs within religious buildings or notices in bulletins from a religious organization mailed to a congregation are not advertising within the meaning of this chapter.

(k) “Referral” means evaluating and identifying the needs of a client to determine whether it is advisable to refer the client to other specialists, informing the client of that judgment, and communicating that determination as requested or deemed appropriate to referral sources.

(l) “Research” means a systematic effort to collect, analyze, and interpret quantitative and qualitative data
 that describes how social characteristics, behavior, emotion, cognitions, disabilities, mental disorders, and interpersonal transactions among individuals and organizations interact.

(m) “Supervision” means responsibility for, and control of, the quality of mental health and related services provided by the supervisee. Consultation or peer discussion shall not be considered supervision and shall not qualify as supervised experience. Supervision includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Ensuring the extent, kind, and quality of counseling performed is consistent with the education, training, and experience of the supervisee.

(2) Monitoring and evaluating the supervisee’s assessment, diagnosis, and
 treatment decisions and providing regular feedback.

(3) Monitoring and evaluating the supervisee’s ability to provide services at the site or sites where the supervisee is practicing and to the particular clientele being served.

(4) Monitoring and addressing clinical dynamics, including, but not limited to, countertransference-, intrapsychic-, interpersonal-, or trauma-related issues that may affect the supervisory or the practitioner-patient relationship.

(5) Ensuring the supervisee’s compliance with laws and regulations governing the practice of licensed professional clinical counseling.

(6) Reviewing the supervisee’s progress notes, process notes, and
 other patient treatment records, as deemed appropriate by the supervisor.

(7) With the client’s written consent, providing direct observation or review of audio or video recordings of the supervisee’s counseling or therapy, as deemed appropriate by the supervisor.

(n) “Clinical setting” means any setting that meets both of the following requirements:

(1) Lawfully and regularly provides mental health counseling or psychotherapy.

(2) Provides oversight to ensure that the associate’s work meets the experience and supervision requirements set forth in this chapter and in regulation and is within the scope of practice of the profession.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 86.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.12.5.

(a) (1) The title “professional clinical counselor intern” or “professional clinical counselor registered intern” is hereby renamed “associate professional clinical counselor” or “registered associate professional clinical counselor,” respectively. Any reference in any statute or regulation to a “professional clinical counselor intern” or “professional clinical counselor registered intern” shall be deemed a reference to an “associate professional clinical counselor” or “registered associate professional clinical counselor.”

(2) Any reference in this chapter to the term “intern” means “associate.”

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to expand or constrict the scope of practice of a person licensed or registered pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 15.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.13.

A person engages in the practice of professional clinical counseling when he or she performs or offers to perform or holds himself or herself out as able to perform this service for remuneration in any form, including donations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 148, Sec. 4.   (SB 274)   Effective August 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.14.

The board shall do all of the following:

(a) Communicate information about its activities, the requirements and qualifications for licensure, and the practice of professional clinical counseling to the relevant educational institutions, supervisors, professional associations, applicants, clinical counselor trainees, associates, and the public.

(b) Develop policies and procedures to assist educational institutions in meeting the educational qualifications of Sections 4999.32 and 4999.33.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 703, Sec. 38.   (SB 1491)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Scope of Practice [4999.20. - 4999.27.]

4999.20.

(a) (1) “Professional clinical counseling” means the application of counseling interventions and psychotherapeutic techniques to identify and remediate cognitive, mental, and emotional issues, including personal growth, adjustment to disability, crisis intervention, and psychosocial and environmental problems, and the use, application, and integration of the coursework and training required by Sections 4999.32 and 4999.33. “Professional clinical counseling” includes conducting assessments for the purpose of establishing counseling goals and objectives to empower individuals to deal adequately with life situations, reduce stress, experience growth, change behavior, and make well-informed, rational decisions.

(2) “Professional clinical counseling” is focused exclusively on the application of counseling interventions and psychotherapeutic techniques for the purposes of improving mental health, and is not intended to capture other, nonclinical forms of counseling for the purposes of licensure. For purposes of this paragraph, “nonclinical” means nonmental health.

(3) “Professional clinical counseling” does not include the provision of clinical social work services.

(b) “Counseling interventions and psychotherapeutic techniques” means the application of cognitive, affective, verbal or nonverbal, systemic or holistic counseling strategies that include principles of development, wellness, and maladjustment that reflect a pluralistic
 society. These interventions and techniques are specifically implemented in the context of a professional clinical counseling relationship and use a variety of counseling theories and approaches.

(c) “Assessment” means selecting, administering, scoring, and interpreting tests, instruments, and other tools and methods designed to measure an individual’s attitudes, abilities, aptitudes, achievements, interests, personal characteristics, disabilities, and mental, emotional, and behavioral concerns and development and the use of methods and techniques for understanding human behavior in relation to coping with, adapting to, or ameliorating changing life situations, as part of the counseling process. “Assessment” shall not include the use of projective techniques in the assessment of personality, individually administered intelligence
 tests, neuropsychological testing, or utilization of a battery of three or more tests to determine the presence of psychosis, dementia, amnesia, cognitive impairment, or criminal behavior.

(d) Professional clinical counselors shall refer clients to other licensed health care professionals when they identify issues beyond their own scope of education, training, and experience.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 440, Sec. 3.   (AB 462)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.22.

(a) Nothing in this chapter shall prevent qualified persons from doing work of a psychosocial nature consistent with the standards and ethics of their respective professions. However, these qualified persons shall not hold themselves out to the public by any title or description of services incorporating the words “licensed professional clinical counselor” and shall not state that they are licensed to practice professional clinical counseling, unless they are otherwise licensed to provide professional clinical counseling services.

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to constrict, limit, or withdraw provisions of the Medical Practice Act, the Clinical Social Worker
 Practice Act, the Nursing Practice Act, the Psychology Licensing Law, or the Licensed Marriage and Family Therapist Act.

(c) This chapter shall not apply to any priest, rabbi, or minister of the gospel of any religious denomination who performs counseling services as part of their pastoral or professional duties, or to any person who is admitted to practice law in this state, or who is licensed to practice medicine, who provides counseling services as part of their professional practice.

(d) This chapter shall not apply to an unlicensed or unregistered employee or volunteer working in a governmental entity, a school, a college, a university, or an institution that is both nonprofit and charitable, if both of the following apply:

(1) The work of the employee or volunteer is performed under the oversight and direction of the entity.

(2) (A) On and after July 1, 2020, the employee or volunteer provides a client, prior to initiating psychotherapy services or as soon as practicably possible thereafter, a notice written in at least 12-point type that is in substantially the following form:

NOTICE TO CLIENTS

The (Name of office or unit) of the (Name of agency) receives and responds to complaints regarding the practice of psychotherapy by any unlicensed or unregistered practitioner providing services at (Name of agency). To file a complaint, contact (Telephone number, email address, internet website, or mailing address
 of agency).

The Board of Behavioral Sciences receives and responds to complaints regarding services provided by individuals licensed and registered by the board. If you have a complaint and are unsure if your practitioner is licensed or registered, please contact the Board of Behavioral Sciences at 916-574-7830 for assistance or utilize the board’s online license verification feature by visiting www.bbs.ca.gov.
(B) The delivery of the notice described in subparagraph (A) to the client shall be documented.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivisions (c) and (d), all persons registered as associates or licensed under this chapter shall not be exempt from this chapter or the jurisdiction of the
 board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 747, Sec. 18.5.   (AB 690)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.23.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 4999.30, a person who holds a license in another jurisdiction of the United States as a professional clinical counselor may provide professional clinical counseling services in this state for a period not to exceed 30 consecutive days in any calendar year, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The license from another jurisdiction is at the highest level for independent clinical practice in the jurisdiction in which the license was granted.

(2) The license from another jurisdiction is current, active, and unrestricted.

(3) The client is located in California during the time the person seeks to provide care in California.

(4) The client is a current client of the person and has an established, ongoing client-provider relationship with the person at the time the client became located in California.

(5) The person informs the client of the limited timeframe of the services and that the person is not licensed in California.

(6) The person provides the client with the Board of Behavioral Sciences’ internet website address.

(7) The person informs the client of the jurisdiction in which the person is licensed and the type of license held and provides the client with the
 person’s license number.

(b) A person who intends to provide professional clinical counseling services pursuant to this section shall provide the board with all of the following information before providing services:

(1) The name under which the person is licensed in another jurisdiction, the person’s mailing address, the person’s phone number, the person’s social security number or individual taxpayer identification number, and the person’s electronic mailing address, if the person has an electronic mailing address.

(2) The jurisdiction in which the person is licensed, the type of license held, and the license number.

(3) The date on which the person will begin
 providing professional clinical counseling services to the person’s client in California.

(c) A person who provides services pursuant to this section shall submit a signed statement, under penalty of perjury, acknowledging that they are subject to the jurisdiction of the board and agreeing to be bound by the laws of this state.

(d) This section does not apply to any person licensed by the board whose license has been suspended or revoked.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 787, Sec. 87.   (SB 775)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.25.

The settings described in Section 4999.22 are exempt settings and do not fall under the jurisdiction of this chapter or the board except as specified in Section 4999.22, and with the following exceptions:

(a) Any individual working or volunteering in an exempt setting who is licensed or registered under this chapter shall fall under the jurisdiction of the board and is not exempt from this chapter.

(b) An entity that is licensed or certified by a government regulatory agency to provide health care services shall not be considered an exempt setting unless it directly meets the criteria described in Section 4999.22.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 747, Sec. 20.   (AB 690)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.26.

(a) For the purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Nonexempt setting” means a setting that does not qualify as an exempt setting, as specified in Section 4999.22.

(2) “Private practice” means a type of nonexempt setting that meets all of the following criteria:

(A) The practice is owned by a health professional who is licensed under this division, either independently or jointly with one or more other health professionals who are licensed under this division.

(B) The
 practice provides clinical mental health services, including psychotherapy, to clients.

(C) One or more licensed health professionals are responsible for the practice and for the services provided and set conditions of client payment or reimbursement for the provision of services. 

(3) “Professional corporation” means a type of nonexempt setting and private practice that has been formed pursuant to Part 4 (commencing with Section 13400) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code.

(b) An active license or registration number shall be required to engage in the practice of professional clinical counseling, as defined in Section 4999.20, in nonexempt settings at all times, except as follows:

(1) A trainee may engage in the practice of professional clinical counseling in a nonexempt setting that is not a private practice or a professional corporation while they are gaining supervised experience that meets the requirements of this chapter under the jurisdiction and supervision of their school as specified in Section 4999.36.

(2) An applicant for registration as an associate may engage in the practice of professional clinical counseling in a nonexempt setting that is not a private practice or a professional corporation before the registration number is issued if they are in compliance with subdivision (b) of Section 4999.46 and are gaining supervised experience that meets the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 747, Sec. 21.   (AB 690)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.27.

(a) Nothing in this chapter shall restrict or prevent activities of a psychotherapeutic or counseling nature on the part of persons employed by accredited or state-approved academic institutions, public schools, government agencies, or nonprofit institutions who train graduate students pursuing a degree that qualifies for professional clinical counselor licensure at an accredited or state-approved college or university, provided that these activities and services constitute a part of a supervised course of study and that those persons are designated by a title such as “clinical counselor trainee” or other title clearly indicating the training status appropriate to the level of training.

(b) Notwithstanding
 subdivision (a), a graduate student shall not perform professional clinical counseling in a private practice or a professional corporation.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 4999.24 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 747, Sec. 19.   (AB 690)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Licensure [4999.30. - 4999.67.]

4999.30.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a person shall not practice or advertise the performance of professional clinical counseling services without a license issued by the board, and shall pay the license fee required by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 619, Sec. 3.   (SB 788)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4999.32.

(a) This section shall apply to applicants for licensure or registration who began graduate study before August 1, 2012, and completed that study on or before December 31, 2018. Those applicants may alternatively qualify under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 4999.33.

(b) To qualify for licensure or registration, applicants shall possess a master’s or doctoral degree that is counseling or psychotherapy in content and that meets the requirements of this section, obtained from an accredited or approved institution, as defined in Section 4999.12. For purposes of this subdivision, a degree is “counseling or psychotherapy in content” if it contains the supervised practicum or field study experience described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) and, except as
 provided in subdivision (d), the coursework in the core content areas listed in subparagraphs (A) to (I), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(c) The degree described in subdivision (b) shall be a single, integrated program that contains not less than 48 graduate semester units or 72 graduate quarter units of instruction, which shall, except as provided in subdivision (d), include all of the following:

(1) The equivalent of at least three semester units or four quarter units of graduate study in each of the following core content areas:

(A) Counseling and psychotherapeutic theories and techniques, including the counseling process in a multicultural society, an orientation to wellness and prevention, counseling theories to assist in selection of appropriate counseling interventions, models of counseling
 consistent with current professional research and practice, development of a personal model of counseling, and multidisciplinary responses to crises, emergencies, and disasters.

(B) Human growth and development across the lifespan, including normal and abnormal behavior and an understanding of developmental crises, disability, psychopathology, and situational and environmental factors that affect both normal and abnormal behavior.

(C) Career development theories and techniques, including career development decisionmaking models and interrelationships among and between work, family, and other life roles and factors, including the role of multicultural issues in career development.

(D) Group counseling theories and techniques, including principles of group dynamics, group process components, developmental stage
 theories, therapeutic factors of group work, group leadership styles and approaches, pertinent research and literature, group counseling methods, and evaluation of effectiveness.

(E) Assessment, appraisal, and testing of individuals, including basic concepts of standardized and nonstandardized testing and other assessment techniques, norm-referenced and criterion-referenced assessment, statistical concepts, social and cultural factors related to assessment and evaluation of individuals and groups, and ethical strategies for selecting, administering, and interpreting assessment instruments and techniques in counseling.

(F) Multicultural counseling theories and techniques, including counselors’ roles in developing cultural self-awareness, identity development, promoting cultural social justice, individual and community strategies for working with and advocating for diverse
 populations, and counselors’ roles in eliminating biases and prejudices, and processes of intentional and unintentional oppression and discrimination.

(G) Principles of the diagnostic process, including differential diagnosis, and the use of current diagnostic tools, such as the current edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, the impact of co-occurring substance use disorders or medical psychological disorders, established diagnostic criteria for mental or emotional disorders, and the treatment modalities and placement criteria within the continuum of care.

(H) Research and evaluation, including studies that provide an understanding of research methods, statistical analysis, the use of research to inform evidence-based practice, the importance of research in advancing the profession of counseling, and statistical methods used in conducting research,
 needs assessment, and program evaluation.

(I) Professional orientation, ethics, and law in counseling, including professional ethical standards and legal considerations, licensing law and process, regulatory laws that delineate the profession’s scope of practice, counselor-client privilege, confidentiality, the client dangerous to self or others, treatment of minors with or without parental consent, relationship between practitioner’s sense of self and human values, functions and relationships with other human service providers, strategies for collaboration, and advocacy processes needed to address institutional and social barriers that impede access, equity, and success for clients.

(2) In addition to the course requirements described in paragraph (1), a minimum of 12 semester units or 18 quarter units of advanced coursework to develop knowledge of specific treatment issues,
 special populations, application of counseling constructs, assessment and treatment planning, clinical interventions, therapeutic relationships, psychopathology, or other clinical topics.

(3) Not less than six semester units or nine quarter units of supervised practicum or field study experience that involves direct client contact in a clinical setting that provides a range of professional clinical counseling experience, including the following:

(A) Applied psychotherapeutic techniques.

(B) Assessment.

(C) Diagnosis.

(D) Prognosis.

(E) Treatment planning.

(F) Treatment.

(G) Issues of development, adjustment, and maladjustment.

(H) Health and wellness promotion.

(I) Other recognized counseling interventions.

(J) A minimum of 150 hours of face-to-face supervised clinical experience counseling individuals, families, or groups.

(d) (1) (A) An applicant whose degree is deficient in no more than two of the required areas of study listed in subparagraphs (A) to (I), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) may satisfy those deficiencies by successfully completing postmaster’s or postdoctoral degree coursework at an accredited or approved institution, as defined in Section 4999.12.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), an applicant shall not be deficient in the required areas of study specified in subparagraph (E) or (G) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) unless the applicant meets one of the following criteria and remediates the deficiency:
